Utah statutes.
31A-14-106.   Applicability of corporation provisions.

Except to the extent made applicable by reference under this title, Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, do not apply to insurers licensed under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 340, 2011 General Session

